ferrules-core/src/dictionaries/custom.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY esianrtolcdugmphbyfvkwjkqxz-ëçïâêîôûàä

# Basic rules for technical terms
SFX A Y 1
SFX A   0     s         .

# Plural forms
SFX B Y 2
SFX B   0     s         [^sxzh]
SFX B   0     es        [sxzh]

# Past tense for verbs
SFX C Y 1
SFX C   0     ed        [^e]

# Present participle
SFX D Y 1
SFX D   0     ing       .
