ferrules-core/src/dictionaries/custom.dic
35
unicode/A
utf/A
ascii/A
json/A
xml/A
html/A
css/A
api/AB
url/AB
uri/AB
http/A
https/A
pdf/AB
csv/A
sql/A
regex/A
llm/AB
ai/A
ml/A
nlp/A
bert/A
gpt/A
sdk/AB
gui/AB
cli/AB
ide/AB
github/A
gitlab/A
stackoverflow/A
microsoft/A
google/A
meta/A
openai/A
anthropic/A
claude/A
